Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.010

Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to facilitate and permit taxing districts which are unable to meet their debts either in their present amount and/or at the time they fall due, to obtain relief by the readjustment of such debts as provided for by the act of congress hereinafter referred to, by supplementing the powers of those taxing districts for which refunding of debts is provided for by existing statutes, and by providing a method of refunding of debts for those taxing districts for which no method of refunding such debts has heretofore been provided, and by other provisions appropriate to such purposes.

This chapter shall not be construed as in anywise limiting the powers of the federal courts to grant relief as provided for in said act of congress.

[ 1935 c 143 s 2; RRS s 5608-2.]